Utah statutes.
70A-2a-533.   Effective date.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), this act takes effect on July 1,
1990 and shall apply to all lease contracts that are first made or that first
become effective between the parties on or after that date, but shall not
apply to lease contracts first made or that first became effective prior to
that date unless the parties thereto specifically agree in writing that the
lease contract as extended, amended, modified, renewed or supplemented, shall
be governed by applicable law as supplemented or amended by this act.  Absent
such specific agreement transactions validly entered into before that date and
the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them remain valid thereafter
and may be terminated, completed, consummated or enforced as though this act
had not taken effect.
(2)  The amendments to Sections 70A-1-201, 70A-9-113, 70A-9-306, and 70A-9-318
take effect on July 1, 1990.
